src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Russian tags

## Stressed vowels

* а́ е́ ё́ и́ о́ у́ ы́ э́ ю́ я́      Primary stress (lower)
* а̀ ѐ ё̀ ѝ о̀ у̀ ы̀ э̀ ю̀ я̀      Secondary stress (lower)

* А́ Е́ Ё́ И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Ю́ Я́     Primary stress (upper)
* А̀ Ѐ Ё̀ Ѝ О̀ У̀ Ы̀ Э̀ Ю̀ Я̀     Secondary stress (upper)

## Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc): (copied from sme)

## Markers

* ¹ ² ³ ⁴ ⁵ ⁶ ⁷ ⁸ ⁹ ⁰  = Used to enumerate homonymous lemmas
* %>    = End-of-stem marker (nominals)
* %<    = End-of-stem marker (verbs)
* %^F   = Fleeting vowel marker
* %^o %^O  = Verbal prefix fleeting vowel
* %^G   = Irregular GenPl marker (to keep ов/ев on n stems, e.g. ов%^G
* %^Z   = Zero ending (resolves to 0/й/ь)
* %^M   = Verb stem mutation
* %^D   = archiphoneme for д~жд alternation in past passive participles
* %^T   = archiphoneme for т~щ alternation in verbs
* %^d   = archiphoneme for verb stems with -дший past active participles (-сти 7 (-д-) )
* %^t   = archiphoneme for verb stems with -тший past active participles (-сти 7 (-т-) )
* %^R   = archiphoneme for бороть and пороть
* %^U   = Imperative ending (unstressed)
* %^S  = Imperative ending (stressed)
* %^P  = Attenuative comparative prefix: по~
* %^A  = Attenuative comparative prefix: по~
* %^Y  = Verbal prefix вы́-

## POS
* +A       = Adjective
* +Abbr    = Abbreviation
* +Adv     = Adverb
* +CC      = Coordinating conjunction
* +CS      = Subordinating conjunction
* +Det     = Determiner
* +Interj  = Interjection
* +N       = Noun
* +Num     = Numeral
* +Paren   = Parenthetical вводное слово
* +Pcle    = Particle
* +Po      = Postposition (ради is the only postposition)
* +Pr      = Preposition
* +Pron    = Pronoun
* +V       = Verb

## Sub-POS
* +All     = All: весь
* +Coll    = Collective numerals
* +Def     = Definite
* +Dem     = Demonstrative
* +Indef   = Indefinite: кто-то, кто-нибудь, кто-либо, кое-кто, etc.
* +Interr  = Interrogative: кто, что, какой, ли, etc.
* +Neg     = Negative: никто, некого, etc.
* +Pers    = Personal
* +Pos     = Possessive, e.g. его, наш
* +Prcnt   = Percent
* +Prop    = Proper
* +Recip   = Reciprocal: друг друга
* +Refl    = Pronoun себя, possessive свой
* +Rel     = Relativizer, e.g. который, где, как, куда, сколько, etc.
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©

## Verbal MSP
* +Impf +Perf        = Imperfective, perfective
* +IV +TV            = Intransitive, transitive (Zaliznjak does not mark trans-only, so transitive verbs all have both TV and IV)
* +Inf +Imp          = Imperatives: 2nd person = читай, 1st person = прочитаем
* +Pst +Prs +Fut     = Past, present, future
* +Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3     = person sg
* +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3     = person pl
* +PrsAct +PrsPss    = Participles (+PrsAct+Adv and +PstAct+Adv are used for the verbal adverbs)
* +PstAct +PstPss    = Participles
* +Pass              = Passive
* +Imprs             = Impersonal (cannot have explicit subject)
* +Lxc             = Lexicalized (for participial forms)

* +Der             = Derived (for participial forms)
* +Der/PrsAct             = Derived (for participial forms)
* +Der/PrsPss             = Derived (for participial forms)
* +Der/PstAct             = Derived (for participial forms)
* +Der/PstPss             = Derived (for participial forms)

## Nominal MSP
* +Msc +Fem +Neu +MFN   = grammatical gender,  +MFN = gender unspecifiable (pl tantum)
* +Inan +Anim +AnIn     = animacy (+AnIn = ambivalent animacy for non-accusative modifiers)
* +Sem/Sur +Sem/Pat     = Surname (фамилия), Patronymic
* +Sem/Ant +Sem/Alt     = Anthroponym/Given name, Other
* +Sg +Pl               = number
* +Nom +Acc +Gen       
* +Loc +Dat +Ins       
* +Loc2 +Gen2 +Voc     
* +Count                = Count (for человек/людей or лет/годов, etc. also шага́/шара́/часа́/etc.)
* +Ord      = Ordinal
* +Cmpar    = Comparative
* +Sint     = Synthetic comparative is possible, e.g. старее
* +Pred     = "Predicate", also used for short-form adjectives
* +Cmpnd    = "Compound", used for compounding adjectives, such as русско-английский
* +Att      = Attenuative comparatives like получше, поновее, etc.

## Punctuation
* +PUNCT    = Punctuation
* +CLB    = Clause boundary  ! TODO SENT vs CLB which is which?
* +SENT    = Clause boundary
* +COMMA   = Comma
* +DASH    = Dash
* +LQUOT    = Left quotation
* +RQUOT    = Right quotation
* +QUOT    = "Ambidextrous" quotation
* +LPAR     = Left parenthesis/bracket
* +RPAR     = Right parenthesis/bracket
* +LEFT     = Left parenthesis/bracket/quote/etc.
* +RIGHT     = Right parenthesis/bracket/quote/etc.

## Other tags
* +Prb      = +Prb(lematic): затруднительно - предположительно - нет
* +Fac      = Facultative
* +PObj     = Object of preposition (prothetic н: него нее них)
* +Epenth   = epenthesis on prepositions (о~об~обо or в~во)
* +Leng     = Lengthened доброй~доброю (marks less-canonical wordform that has more syllables)
* +Elid     = Elided (Иванович~Иваныч, новее~новей, чтобы~чтоб, или~иль, коли~коль)
* +Use/NG   = Do not generate (used for apertium, etc.)
* +Use/Obs  = Obsolete
* +Use/Ant  = Antiquated "устаревшее"
* +Err/Orth  = Substandard
* +Err/L2_a2o      = L2 error: Misspelling (о should be а)
* +Err/L2_e2je     = L2 error: Misspelling (е should be э)
* +Err/L2_FV       = L2 error: Presence of fleeting vowel where it should be deleted, e.g. отеца (compare отца). +Err/L2_FV only occurs in lexemes that have a fleeting vowel in at least one form.
* +Err/L2_H2S      = L2 error: Misspelling (ь should be ъ)
* +Err/L2_i2j      = L2 error: Misspelling (й should be и)
* +Err/L2_i2y      = L2 error: Misspelling (ы should be и)
* +Err/L2_ii       = L2 error: Failure to change ending ие to ии in +Sg+Loc or +Sg+Dat, e.g. к Марие, о кафетерие, о знание. +Err/L2_ii is only possible on nouns with a stem in и
* +Err/L2_Ikn      = L2 error: Ikanje (и should be е or я)
* +Err/L2_j2i      = L2 error: Misspelling (и should be й)
* +Err/L2_je2e     = L2 error: Misspelling (э should be е)
* +Err/L2_NoFV     = L2 error: Lack of fleeting vowel where it should be inserted, e.g. окн (compare окон). +Err/L2_NoFV only occurs in lexemes that have a fleeting vowel in at least one form.
* +Err/L2_NoGem    = L2 error: Geminate letter is missing
* +Err/L2_NoSS     = L2 error: Misspelling (ь is missing)
* +Err/L2_o2a      = L2 error: Akanje (а should be о)
* +Err/L2_Pal      = L2 error: Palatalization: failure to place soft-indicating symbol after soft stem, e.g. земла (compare земля). +Err/L2_Pal only occurs on 1) nouns and modifiers that have a soft stem, or 2) verbs in евать, e.g. малует (compare малюет)
* +Err/L2_prijti   = L2 error: Misspelling the stem of прийти, especially the й
* +Err/L2_revIkn   = L2 error: Reversed ikanje, i.e. spelling и as е/я/а to reflect supposed vowel reduction
* +Err/L2_sh2shch  = L2 error: Misspelling (щ should be ш)
* +Err/L2_shch2sh  = L2 error: Misspelling (ш should be щ)
* +Err/L2_ski      = L2 error: по-~ский instead of по-~ски
* +Err/L2_SRc      = L2 error: L2 error: replace и with ы or vice versa after ц
* +Err/L2_SRo      = L2 error: Failure to change о to е after hushers and ц, e.g. Сашой (compare Сашей). +Err/L2+SRo only occurs in 1) nouns and modifiers with stems in hushers or ц, or 2) verbs in евать, e.g. танцовать (compare танцевать)
* +Err/L2_SRy      = L2 error: Failure to change ы to и after hushers and velars, e.g. книгы (compare книги). +Err/L2+SRo only occurs in nouns and modifiers with stems in hushers or velars
* +Err/L2_y2i      = L2 error: Misspelling (и should be ы)

# Key lexicon

* LEXICON Root    

* Abbreviation ;	
* :%^P%^A Adjective ;	    
* Adverb ;	    
* Comparative ;   
* Conjunction ;   
* Interjection ;  
* Noun ;		    
* Numeral ;       
* Parenthetical ; 
* Particle ;      
* Predicative ;   
* Preposition ;   
* Pronoun ;	    
* Verb ;		    
* Propernoun ;    
* Punctuation ;   
* Symbols     ;   
* LexicalizedParticiple ;   

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/trondtynnol/lang-rus-trondtynnol/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
